Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1000 of Title 40, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Health
Care Workplace Incentive Safety Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1001 of Title 40, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For all participating hospitals and health care systems
participating in this act, the Oklahoma Employment Security
Commission shall pay incentives pursuant to a system developed by
Req. No. 15240 Page 1

the Oklahoma Health Care Workplace Safety Committee, as created in
Section 3 of this act. The Committee shall develop and administer a
system for ensuring appropriate utilization and quality of workplace
safety by those providers who are reimbursed under this section.
The Oklahoma Employment Security Commission shall promulgate rules
to provide for the implementation of this section.
B. Beginning November 1, 2026, and each November thereafter,
the Committee shall assess whether each hospital has adopted a
formal policy to address workplace violence and submit the reporting
requirements to the Legislature.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1002 of Title 40, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Health Care Workplace Safety Committee shall
consist of the following members:
1. State Commissioner of Health, or designee;
2. One health care human resource director to be appointed by
the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives;
3. One health care human resource director to be appointed by
the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate;
4. One representative from the Oklahoma Hospital Association;
5. The Chair of the State Board of Health, or designee; and
6. Four health care support staff to be appointed by the
Oklahoma Hospital Association.
Req. No. 15240 Page 2

B. The Committee shall:
1. Develop recommended workplace violence metrics after
evaluating available national standards, considering innovative
approaches, and accounting for variations across hospitals;
2. Determine whether any federal or private funds are available
to assist hospitals in lowering the number of incidents of workplace
violence;
3. Develop legislative recommendations; and
4. Submit annual reports to the Legislature.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15240 TKR 01/15/26












Req. No. 15240 Page 3